North Carolina, session 2025, SB331.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Section 27.7 of S.L. 2023-134, with the exception of subsection (d),
and Section 27.9 of S.L. 2023-134 are repealed.
SECTION 2. G.S. 120-130 reads as rewritten:
"§ 120-130. Drafting and information requests to legislative employees.
(a) A drafting request made to a legislative employee from a legislator is confidential.
Neither The legislative employee may not reveal the identity of the legislator making the request
nor, except to the extent necessary to answer the request, reveal the existence of the request may
be revealed to any person who is not a legislative employee without the consent of the legislator.
(b) An information request made to a legislative employee from a legislator is
confidential. Neither The legislative employee may not reveal the identity of the legislator
making the request nor, except to the extent necessary to answer the request, reveal the existence
of the request may be revealed to any person who is not a legislative employee without the
consent of the legislator. Notwithstanding the preceding sentences of this subsection, the periodic
publication by the Fiscal Research Division of the Legislative Services Office of a list of
information requests is not prohibited, if the identity of the legislator making the request is not
revealed.
(c) Any supporting documents submitted or caused to be submitted to a legislative
employee by a legislator in connection with a drafting or information request are confidential.
Except to the extent necessary to answer the request, neither the document nor copies of it, nor
the identity of the person, firm, or association producing it, may be provided to any person who
is not a legislative employee without the consent of the legislator.
(d) Drafting or information requests or supporting documents are not "public records" as
defined by G.S. 132-1."
SECTION 3. G.S. 120-131, as amended by Section 1 of this act, reads as rewritten:
"§ 120-131. Documents produced by legislative employees.
(a) Documents prepared by legislative employees upon the request of legislators are
confidential. Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the legislative employee may
not reveal the existence of the document may not be revealed nor may the legislative employee
provide a copy of the document be provided to any person who is not a legislative employee
without the consent of the legislator.
(b) A document prepared by a legislative employee upon the request of a legislator
becomes available to the public when the document is a:
(1) Bill or resolution and it has been introduced;
*S331-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Proposed amendment or committee substitute for a bill or resolution and it has
been offered at a committee meeting or on the floor of a house;
(3) Proposed conference committee report and it has been offered at a joint
meeting of the conference committees; or
(4) Bill, resolution, memorandum, written analysis, letter, or other document
resulting from a drafting or information request and it has been distributed at
a legislative commission or standing committee or subcommittee meeting not
held in executive session, closed session, or on the floor of a house.
A document prepared by a legislative employee upon the request of any legislator, that pursuant
to this Article does not become available to the public, is not a "public record," as defined by
G.S. 132-1.
…."
SECTION 4. G.S. 120-132, as amended by Section 1 of this act, reads as rewritten:
"§ 120-132. Testimony by legislative employees.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, no present or former
legislative employee may disclose any documents or information that the individual, while
employed or retained by the State, may have acquired:
(1) In a standing, select, or conference committee or subcommittee of either house
of the General Assembly or a legislative commission;commission.
(2) On the floor of either house of the General Assembly, in any office of a
legislator, or at any other location of the State legislative buildings and
grounds as defined in G.S. 120-32.1(d);G.S. 120-32.1(d).
(3) As a result of communications that are confidential under G.S. 120-130 and
G.S. 120-131.
(b) A present or former legislative employee may disclose information or documents
acquired under subsection (a) of this section that would be reflected in the official public record
or was that were otherwise publicly disseminated.
(c) Subject to G.S. 120-9, G.S. 120-133, and the common law of legislative privilege and
legislative immunity, the presiding judge may compel disclosure of information or documents
acquired by the legislative employee under subsection (a) of this section if in the judge's opinion,
the disclosure is necessary to a proper administration of justice."
SECTION 5. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 331-First Edition